Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2

Organization and Operation

45-4-201. Election of directors — Terms.

At an annual meeting, the members shall elect a board of directors. The directors shall be members of the credit union. All members of the board of directors and all officers shall hold their several offices for the terms that may be provided in the bylaws.

Upon their election, the names of the members of the board of directors shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting at which they are elected, and filed in the permanent records of the credit union.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 2198a16; Code 1932, § 3844; Acts 1937, ch. 264, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3844; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1812; Acts 1980, ch. 559, § 2; 1985, ch. 17, § 1; 1989, ch. 223, § 2.

45-4-202. Board of directors — General management — Special duties.

The board of directors has the duty of general management of the affairs, funds and records of the corporation, and shall meet as often as may be necessary, but in no event less than monthly. Unless the bylaws shall specifically reserve any or all of the duties to members, it is the special duty of the directors to:

Act upon all applications for membership and on the expulsion of members; however, the board of directors may appoint a membership officer from among the members of the credit union, other than the treasurer, assistant treasurer or loan officer, who may approve applications for membership under the conditions that the board may prescribe, except that this membership officer shall submit to the board at each regular meeting a list of approved or pending applications for membership received since the previous regular meeting;

Inspect or cause to be inspected the securities, cash, and accounts, and to review the acts of all committees and the officers of the credit union at frequent intervals, but in no event less than annually. The board of directors shall make or cause to be made, at least annually, a thorough review or audit of the receipts, disbursements, income, assets and liabilities of the credit union for the year and shall make a full report thereon to the membership, which report shall be read or provided at the annual meeting and shall be filed and preserved with the records of the credit union. The board of directors shall determine whether to appoint a supervisory committee to carry out these duties and functions and to report its findings to the board in accordance with its directives;

Determine, from time to time, rates of interest that will be allowed on members' special accounts and charged on loans;

Determine the amount of the blanket surety bond that is required for all officials and employees, which amount shall be as follows:

For one (1) year from the charter date, the bond shall be not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000);

Thereafter, the bond shall not be less than thirty percent (30%) of the true assets of the credit union, or, if the bond contains a deductible clause:

The bond shall exceed the deductible amount provided in the clause by not less than thirty percent (30%) of the true assets of the credit union;

The amount of the bond shall be adjusted annually subject to a maximum bond requirement in any case of one million dollars ($1,000,000), or a greater amount required by the credit union share insuror; and

The blanket surety bond does not include a deductible clause without the written approval of the commissioner of financial institutions, upon terms and conditions that the commissioner may establish by rule, and unless the credit union maintains all statutory and insuror reserves, including a reserve for the deductible equal to the amount of the deductible;

Fix, if it deems necessary, the maximum number of shares that may be held by and the maximum amount that may be loaned to any one (1) member;

Declare dividends;

Fill vacancies on the board of directors until the election and qualification of successors;

Have charge of the investment of funds of the corporation, other than loans to members and to perform other duties that the members may, from time to time, authorize;

Review the acts of all committees and the officers and to remove by two-thirds (2/3) vote of the entire board of directors any or all members of the committees or the officers for cause, including the failure to discharge assigned responsibilities, any acts involving dishonesty or breach of trust, any act, omission or practice that constitutes a breach of fiduciary duty to the credit union or that is a violation of the credit union's bylaws, policies, or the laws or regulations of the state; and

On January 1, 1990, all credit committees and supervisory committees existing by virtue of prior legislation shall be dissolved. Resolutions or other actions taken by a board of directors prior to January 1, 1990, for the purpose of establishing committees or procedures consistent with its provisions and so stating, shall be valid, and shall be effective as of January 1, 1990.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 2198a18; Code 1932, § 3845; Acts 1963, ch. 30, § 3; 1979, ch. 86, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1813; Acts 1985, ch. 17, § 2; 1989, ch. 223, §§ 3-6; 1992, ch. 584, §§ 1, 2.

45-4-203. Choice between credit committee or loan officers — Duties — Loans — Applications and security.

The board of directors shall determine whether the credit union shall have a credit committee. If the board determines that the credit union shall not have a credit committee, the board of directors shall appoint one (1) or more loan officers, and the loan officer or officers shall approve or disapprove every loan or advance made by the corporation to members. If the board of directors determines that the credit union shall have a credit committee, the credit committee shall be appointed by the board of directors, report to the board of directors, serve under the terms and conditions determined by the board of directors and approve or disapprove every loan or advance made by the corporation to members, except as herein provided. The credit committee may appoint one (1) or more loan officers and delegate to the loan officer or officers the power to approve or disapprove loans. Each loan officer shall furnish to the credit committee, or, in the absence of the committee, to the board of directors, a record of each loan approved or not approved by the officer within thirty (30) days of the date of the filing of the application for the loan. No individual shall have authority to disburse funds of the credit union for any loan that has been approved by that person in capacity as a loan officer.

Every application for a loan shall be in writing, on a form prepared by the board of directors, and shall state the purpose for which the loan is desired and the security, if any, offered.

The board of directors shall establish the maximum limits for unsecured loans, subject, however, to the other provisions of this section. Endorsement of a note or assignment of shares in any credit union may be considered security in the meaning of this section. When a loan is considered by the credit committee, no loan shall be made unless it has received the unanimous approval of the members of the committee present when the loan was considered, which number shall constitute at least a majority of the committee. No loan shall be made to any member that causes the member to become indebted to the credit union in the aggregate, upon loans made to the member, in excess of ten percent (10%) of the credit union's assets, or three hundred dollars ($300), whichever is greater.

An applicant for a loan may appeal to:

The directors if the initial decision to disapprove the loan is made by the credit committee or by a loan officer in the absence of a credit committee; or

The credit committee if the initial decision to disapprove the loan is made by a loan officer.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 2198a20; Code 1932, § 3847; Acts 1947, ch. 125, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3847; Acts 1957, ch. 69, § 1; 1959, ch. 199, § 1; 1963, ch. 30, § 4; 1967, ch. 227, § 4; 1970, ch. 409, § 1; 1979, ch. 86, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1815; Acts 1981, ch. 53, §§ 1-3; 1985, ch. 17, § 3; 1989, ch. 223, § 7.

45-4-204. [Reserved.]

No member of the credit or supervisory committee shall receive any compensation for services as a member of the committee.

As an alternative to the reimbursement for members of the board of directors in subsection (c), each member of the board of directors may be compensated subject to the following conditions:

The board shall adopt a resolution stating that the credit union requires expertise among board members for the prudent general management of the affairs, funds and records of the credit union;

Such compensation shall be payable to board members elected after the adoption of the resolution in subdivision (b)(1);

The credit union shall adopt a policy governing the participation and attendance that a board member shall comply with in order to receive compensation; and

The annual report of the credit union's income and expenses shall include board member compensation as a specific expense item.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the board of directors may provide that the credit union shall reimburse any member of the board of directors or the credit or supervisory committee for any loss of earnings caused by time spent in the service of the credit union, in an amount that the board of directors may determine, not to exceed the amount of the lost earnings.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 2198a19; Code 1932, § 3846; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1814; Acts 1985, ch. 17, § 4; 2013, ch. 59, § 1.

45-4-206. Restriction on withdrawal of shares or accounts — Stop orders — Removal of officers or employees — Taking possession — Hearing.

In addition to other powers conferred by this chapter, the commissioner may:

Restrict the withdrawal of shares or accounts from any state credit union when the commissioner finds circumstances make the restriction necessary for the proper protection of the members' interest in the shares or accounts;

Order any person to cease violating any provision of the credit union laws of this state or any lawful rule issued under those laws, or to cease engaging in any unsound practice when the practice is likely to cause financial loss to the credit union or otherwise seriously prejudice the interests of its members;

Remove a director, officer, committee member or employee of a credit union who, after receipt of an order to cease under subdivision (a)(2), violates the credit union laws of this state or a lawful rule or order under those laws, or who has committed any act, omission or practice that constitutes a breach of the person's fiduciary duty to the credit union or that is a violation of the credit union laws or regulations of the state, and the act, omission or practice has caused or probably will cause substantial financial loss to the credit union. A removal order shall specify the grounds therefor, and a copy shall be sent to the credit union concerned. It is a Class A misdemeanor for any person, after receipt of a removal order, to perform any duty or exercise any power in the credit union concerned until such time as the removal order is modified or terminated by the commissioner or a reviewing court;

Suspend by written order any officer, director, employee, or committee member of a credit union who has been charged with the commission of, or participation in, a felony involving dishonesty or breach of trust. The order of suspension shall remain in effect until the disposition of the charge and the indictment is final, unless the order is sooner terminated by the commissioner. In the event that a conviction with respect to the offense is entered against a director, officer, employee, or committee member and the conviction is not subject to further appellate review, the commissioner may issue an order removing the director, officer, employee, or committee member from office or employment with the credit union. A finding of not guilty shall not prohibit the commissioner from thereafter instituting proceedings against the director, officer, committee member or employee pursuant to subdivision (a)(3). It is a Class A misdemeanor for any person to perform any duty or exercise any power in the credit union concerned while the order of suspension or removal remains in effect; and

Take possession of the business and property of a credit union if the commissioner finds that:

The credit union is insolvent or it is otherwise in an unsound condition;

Its business is being conducted in an unlawful or unsound manner;

It is unable to continue normal operations;

Its examination has been obstructed or impeded; or

The credit union has failed to comply with a lawful order of the commissioner within a reasonable time.

The commissioner may retain possession until such time as the commissioner permits the credit union to resume business, order the merger of the credit union with another credit union without the approval of the members of the credit union to be merged as required under § 45-4-903, or order the liquidation of the credit union.

Notice and opportunity for hearing shall be provided in advance of any of the foregoing actions in this section taken by the commissioner. In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take the action without advance notice but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon application to rescind the action taken.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 2198a13; Code 1932, § 3841; Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1977, ch. 117, § 2; 1979, ch. 86, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1810; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 1; 1993, ch. 56, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor provision in (a)(4) formerly read: “It is a misdemeanor punishable under §39-1-202 [repealed] for any person to perform any duty or exercise any power in the credit union concerned while the order of suspension or removal remains in effect.” The Code Commission deems this offense to be a Class A misdemeanor, in light of the repeal of §39-1-202 and the language of §40-35-110 designating unclassified misdemeanors as Class A misdemeanors.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

45-4-207. Unlawful actions.

It is unlawful for an officer, director, employee or agent of a credit union to:

Maintain or authorize the maintenance of any account of the credit union in a manner that, to the person's knowledge, does not conform to the requirements prescribed by chapter 4 of this title, or by the commissioner;

With intent to deceive, make any false or misleading statement or entry or omit any statement or entry that should be made in any book, account, report or statement of the credit union; or

Obstruct or endeavor to obstruct a lawful examination of the credit union by an officer or employee of the department of financial institutions.

A violation of this section is punishable as provided in § 45-4-208.

Acts 1988, ch. 550, § 3.

45-4-208. Penalty — Liability of officers.

Any person responsible for an act or omission expressly declared to be a criminal offense by chapter 4 of this title commits:

A Class A misdemeanor; and

If the act or omission was intended to defraud, a Class E felony.

An officer, director or employee of a credit union shall be responsible for an act or omission of the credit union declared to be a criminal offense pursuant to this chapter, whenever, knowing that the act or omission is unlawful, the officer, director or employee participates in authorizing or ratifying the omission or, having the duty to take the required action, omits to do so.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, it shall be no defense to a criminal prosecution hereunder that the defendant did not know the facts establishing the criminal character of the act or omission charged if the defendant could and should have known the facts in the proper performance of the defendant's duty.

Acts 1988, ch. 550, § 4; 1989, ch. 591, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A misdemeanor and Class E felony, §40-35-111.